Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska84-217
Section; cumulative to existing remedies.

Section 84-216 is cumulative to any existing remedies which may exist.

Laws 1977, LB 46, § 3;

Laws 2024, LB287, § 73.
July 19, 2024